Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2119
Insurance coverage; authorized.

A learning community coordinating council may permit members of such council to participate in the learning community's hospitalization, medical, surgical, accident, sickness, or term life insurance coverage or any one or more of such coverages. A learning community coordinating council member electing to participate in the insurance program of the learning community shall pay both the employee and the employer portions of the premium for such coverage.

A learning community coordinating council which opts to permit its members to participate in insurance coverage under this section shall report quarterly at a council meeting the council members who have elected such coverage. Such a report shall be made available in the learning community office for review by the public upon request.

Laws 2008, LB850, § 2.